Nebraska, session 109, LB416.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB416 LB416
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 25-21,185.11, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is amended to read:
25-21,185.11 (1) A release, covenant not to sue, or similar
agreement entered into by a claimant and a person liable shall discharge
that person from all liability to the claimant but shall not discharge
any other persons liable upon the same claim unless it so provides. The
claim of the claimant against other persons liable shall be reduced by
the amount of the released person's share of the obligation as determined
by the trier of fact.
(2) A release, covenant not to sue, or similar agreement entered
into by a claimant and a person liable shall preclude that person from
being made a party or, if an action is pending, shall be a basis for that
person's dismissal, but the person's negligence, if any, shall be
considered in accordance with section 25-21,185.09.
(3) A release, covenant not to sue, or similar agreement entered
into by a claimant and one or more persons liable shall not abrogate the
joint and several liability of any other person or persons liable upon
the same claim.
Sec. 2. Original section 25-21,185.11, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-